Virginia statutes. Title 47.1. Notaries and Out-of-State Commissioners.
Chapter 1. General Provisions.

§ 47.1-1.
Short title.

This title may be cited as the “Virginia Notary Act.”

History.

1980, c. 580.

Cross references.

As to requirements related to recording writings by court clerks, see §

17.1-223

.

As to requirements related to electronic filing, see §

17.1-258.4

.

For provisions of the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act, see §

55.1-661

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1980, c. 580, repealed former Title 47, Notaries and Out-of-State Commissioners, and enacted a new Title 47.1 in its place. Acts 1980, c. 580, cl. 2 provides: “That all appointments and commissions of all notaries made prior to the effective date of this act [July 1, 1980] are hereby approved, confirmed and ratified as of the date of their appointments and all acknowledgments and other official acts of such notaries taken prior to the effective date of this act are hereby validated.”

Where appropriate, the historical citations to the sections in repealed Title 47 have been added to corresponding sections in Title 47.1.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 42 Electronic Filing. § 42.01 Electronic Filing of Documents: Rule 1:17. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-1801 Acknowledgment by Notary Public, et seq.; No. 16-500. Virginia Land Records Cover Sheet for Recordation of Deed, et seq.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Legal sufficiency of notary’s seal. —

The legal sufficiency of a notary’s seal is not affected by the presence or absence of the words “Commonwealth of Virginia,” and a contrary result is not required by instructions contained in a handbook for notaries prepared by the Secretary of the Commonwealth regarding the form of a notary’s seal. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable L. Preston Bryant Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 00-021 (5/15/00).

§ 47.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context demands a different meaning:

“Acknowledgment”
means a notarial act in which an individual at a single time and place (i) appears in person before the notary and presents a document; (ii) is personally known to the notary or identified by the notary through satisfactory evidence of identity; and (iii) indicates to the notary that the signature on the document was voluntarily affixed by the individual for the purposes stated within the document and, if applicable, that the individual had due authority to sign in a particular representative capacity.

“Affirmation”
means a notarial act, or part thereof, that is legally equivalent to an oath and in which an individual at a single time and place (i) appears in person before the notary and presents a document; (ii) is personally known to the notary or identified by the notary through satisfactory evidence of identity; and (iii) makes a vow of truthfulness or fidelity on penalty of perjury.

“Commissioned notary public”
means that the applicant has completed and submitted the registration forms along with the appropriate fee to the Secretary of the Commonwealth and the Secretary of the Commonwealth has determined that the applicant meets the qualifications to be a notary public and issues a notary commission and forwards same to the clerk of the circuit court, pursuant to this chapter.

“Copy certification”
means a notarial act in which a notary (i) is presented with a document that is not a public record; (ii) copies or supervises the copying of the document using a photographic or electronic copying process; (iii) compares the document to the copy; and (iv) determines that the copy is accurate and complete.

“Credential analysis”
means a process or service that independently affirms the veracity of a government-issued identity credential by reviewing public or proprietary data sources and meets the standards of the Secretary of the Commonwealth.

“Credible witness”
means an honest, reliable, and impartial person who personally knows an individual appearing before a notary and takes an oath or affirmation from the notary to confirm that individual’s identity.

“Document”
means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form, including a record as defined in the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (§ 59.1-479 et seq.).

“Electronic”
means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic document”
means information that is created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

“Electronic notarial act”
or

“electronic notarization”

means an official act by a notary under §

47.1-12

or as otherwise authorized by law that involves electronic documents.

“Electronic notarial certificate”
means the portion of a notarized electronic document that is completed by the notary public, bears the notary public’s signature, title, commission expiration date, and other required information concerning the date and place of the electronic notarization, and states the facts attested to or certified by the notary public in a particular notarization. The “electronic notarial certificate” shall indicate whether the notarization was done in person or by remote online notarization.

“Electronic notary public”
or

“electronic notary”

means a notary public who has been commissioned by the Secretary of the Commonwealth with the capability of performing electronic notarial acts under §

47.1-7

.

“Electronic notary seal”
or

“electronic seal”

means information within a notarized electronic document that confirms the notary’s name, jurisdiction, and commission expiration date and generally corresponds to data in notary seals used on paper documents.

“Electronic signature”
means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document.

“Identity proofing”
means a process or service that independently verifies an individual’s identity in accordance with §

2.2-436

.

“Notarial act”
or

“notarization”

means any official act performed by a notary under §

47.1-12

or

47.1-13

or as otherwise authorized by law.

“Notarial certificate”
or

“certificate”

means the part of, or attachment to, a notarized document that is completed by the notary public, bears the notary public’s signature, title, commission expiration date, notary registration number, and other required information concerning the date and place of the notarization and states the facts attested to or certified by the notary public in a particular notarization.

“Notary public”
or

“notary”

means any person commissioned to perform official acts under the title, and includes an electronic notary except where expressly provided otherwise.

“Oath”
shall include “affirmation.”

“Official misconduct”
means any violation of this title by a notary, whether committed knowingly, willfully, recklessly or negligently.

“Personal knowledge of identity”
or

“personally knows”

means familiarity with an individual resulting from interactions with that individual over a period of time sufficient to dispel any reasonable uncertainty that the individual has the identity claimed.

“Principal”
means (i) a person whose signature is notarized or (ii) a person, other than a credible witness, taking an oath or affirmation from the notary.

“Record of notarial acts”
means a device for creating and preserving a chronological record of notarizations performed by a notary.

“Remote online notarization”
means an electronic notarization under this chapter where the signer is not in the physical presence of the notary.

“Satisfactory evidence of identity”
means identification of an individual based on (i) examination of one or more of the following unexpired documents bearing a photographic image of the individual’s face and signature: a United States Passport Book, a United States Passport Card, a certificate of United States citizenship, a certificate of naturalization, a foreign passport, an alien registration card with photograph, a state issued driver’s license or a state issued identification card or a United States military card or (ii) the oath or affirmation of one credible witness unaffected by the document or transaction who is personally known to the notary and who personally knows the individual or of two credible witnesses unaffected by the document or transaction who each personally knows the individual and shows to the notary documentary identification as described in clause (i). In the case of an individual who resides in an assisted living facility, as defined in §

63.2-100

, or a nursing home, licensed by the State Department of Health pursuant to Article 1 (§

32.1-123

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 32.1 or exempt from licensure pursuant to §

32.1-124

, an expired United States Passport Book, expired United States Passport Card, expired foreign passport, or expired state issued driver’s license or state issued identification card may also be used for identification of such individual, provided that the expiration of such document occurred within five years of the date of use for identification purposes pursuant to this title. In the case of an electronic notarization, “satisfactory evidence of identity” may be based on video and audio conference technology, in accordance with the standards for electronic video and audio communications set out in subdivisions B 1, 2, and 3 of §

19.2-3.1

, that permits the notary to communicate with and identify the principal at the time of the notarial act, provided that such identification is confirmed by (a) personal knowledge, (b) an oath or affirmation of a credible witness, or (c) at least two of the following: (1) credential analysis of an unexpired government-issued identification bearing a photograph of the principal’s face and signature, (2) identity proofing by an antecedent in-person identity proofing process in accordance with the specifications of the Federal Bridge Certification Authority, (3) another identity proofing method authorized in guidance documents, regulations, or standards adopted pursuant to §

2.2-436

, or (4) a valid digital certificate accessed by biometric data or by use of an interoperable Personal Identity Verification card that is designed, issued, and managed in accordance with the specifications published by the National Institute of Standards and Technology in Federal Information Processing Standards Publication 201-1, “Personal Identity Verification (PIV) of Federal Employees and Contractors,” and supplements thereto or revisions thereof, including the specifications published by the Federal Chief Information Officers Council in “Personal Identity Verification Interoperability for Non-Federal Issuers.”

“Seal”
means a device for affixing on a paper document an image containing the notary’s name and other information related to the notary’s commission.

“Secretary”
means the Secretary of the Commonwealth.

“State”
includes any state, territory, or possession of the United States.

“Verification of fact”
means a notarial act in which a notary reviews public or vital records to (i) ascertain or confirm facts regarding a person’s identity, identifying attributes, or authorization to access a building, database, document, network, or physical site or (ii) validate an identity credential on which satisfactory evidence of identity may be based.

History.

1980, c. 580; 2007, cc. 269, 590; 2011, cc. 731, 834; 2012, c. 566; 2016, c. 185; 2020, c. 902; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 78.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2007, cc. 269 and
590, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this Act relating to electronic notaries public and electronic notarization shall become effective July 1, 2008.”

Acts
2011, cc. 731 and
834, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act relating to the use of video and audio conference technology shall become effective July 1, 2012.” At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, amendments to
§§

47.1-2

and

47.1-14

have been set out as effective July 1, 2012.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 902 inserted the second sentence in the definition for ‘‘Satisfactory evidence of identity.’’

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 78, effective March 11, 2021, inserted the definitions for “Credential analysis,” “Identity proofing” and “Remote online notarization,” added the last sentence in the definition for “Electronic notarial certificate,” and in the definition for “Satisfactory evidence of identity,” in the third sentence, substituted “subdivisions B 1, 2, and 3” for “subdivisions B 1, B 2, and B 3,” inserted “an oath or affirmation of a credible witness, or (c) at least two of the following: (1) credential analysis of an unexpired government-issued identification bearing a photograph of the principal’s face and signature, (2) identity proofing by” at the beginning of clause (b), inserted clause (3) and redesignated clause (c) as clause (4).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority of Secretary of Commonwealth regarding electronic notaries public. —

The Virginia Notary Act does not authorize the Secretary of the Commonwealth to prescribe equipment or technological requirements for electronic notaries public, to prescribe standards beyond that imposed by general law for third-party providers of electronic notary devices or technology, or to promulgate rules or regulations. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Katherine K. Hanley, Secretary of the Commonwealth, 08-022 (4/1/08).